Arkansas, session 2026S1, HB1001.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-51-201(a)(4), concerning the income tax
imposed on individuals, trusts, and estates, is amended to read as follows:
(4) For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026:
(A) Every resident, individual, trust, or estate having
net income less than or equal to ninety-four thousand seven hundred dollars
($94,700) shall determine the amount of income tax due under this subsection
in accordance with the table set forth below:
From Less Than or Equal To Rate
*JLL443*
05/01/2026 8:05:20 AM JLL443

HB1001
$0 $5,599 0%
$5,600 $11,199 2%
$11,200 $15,999 3%
$16,000 $26,399 3.4%
$26,400 $94,700 3.7%
(B) Every resident, individual, trust, or estate having
net income greater than ninety-four thousand seven hundred dollars ($94,700)
shall determine the amount of income tax due under this subsection in
accordance with the table set forth below:
From Less Than or Equal To Rate
$0 $4,700 2%
$4,701 and above 3.7%
(C) Every resident, individual, trust, or estate having
net income greater than or equal to ninety-four thousand seven hundred one
dollars ($94,701) but not greater than ninety-seven thousand six hundred
dollars ($97,600) shall reduce the amount of income tax due as determined
under subdivision (a)(4)(B) of this section by deducting a bracket adjustment
amount in accordance with the table set forth below:
From Less Than or Equal To Bracket Adjustment Amount
$94,701 $94,800 $290
$94,801 $94,900 $280
$94,901 $95,000 $270
$95,001 $95,100 $260
$95,101 $95,200 $250
$95,201 $95,300 $240
$95,301 $95,400 $230
$95,401 $95,500 $220
$95,501 $95,600 $210
$95,601 $95,700 $200
$95,701 $95,800 $190
$95,801 $95,900 $180
$95,901 $96,000 $170
$96,001 $96,100 $160
$96,101 $96,200 $150
$96,201 $96,300 $140
$96,301 $96,400 $130
05/01/2026 8:05:20 AM JLL443

HB1001
$96,401 $96,500 $120
$96,501 $96,600 $110
$96,601 $96,700 $100
$96,701 $96,800 $90
$96,801 $96,900 $80
$96,901 $97,000 $70
$97,001 $97,100 $60
$97,101 $97,200 $50
$97,201 $97,300 $40
$97,301 $97,400 $30
$97,401 $97,500 $20
$97,501 $97,600 $10
$97,601 and over $0
(5) The tables set forth in subdivisions (a)(1)-(3) (a)(1)-(4)
of this section shall be adjusted annually in accordance with the method set
forth in subsection (d) of this section.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-51-205(a), concerning the income tax
levied on domestic corporations, is amended to add an additional subdivision
to read as follows:
(6) For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, every
corporation organized under the laws of this state shall pay annually an
income tax with respect to carrying on or doing business on the entire net
income of the corporation, as now defined by the laws of this state, received
by the corporation during the income year, on the following basis:
(A) On the first three thousand dollars ($3,000) of net
income or any part thereof, one percent (1%);
(B) On the next three thousand dollars ($3,000) of net
income or any part thereof, two percent (2%);
(C) On the next five thousand dollars ($5,000) of net
income or any part thereof, three percent (3%); and
(D) On net income exceeding eleven thousand dollars
($11,000), four and one-tenths percent (4.1%).

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 26-51-205(b), concerning the income tax
levied on foreign corporations, is amended to add an additional subdivision
05/01/2026 8:05:20 AM JLL443

HB1001
to read as follows:
(6) For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, every
foreign corporation doing business within the jurisdiction of this state
shall pay annually an income tax on the proportion of its entire net income
as now defined by the income tax laws of this state, on the following basis:
(A) On the first three thousand dollars ($3,000) of net
income or any part thereof, one percent (1%);
(B) On the next three thousand dollars ($3,000) of net
income or any part thereof, two percent (2%);
(C) On the next five thousand dollars ($5,000) of net
income or any part thereof, three percent (3%); and
(D) On net income exceeding eleven thousand dollars
($11,000), four and one-tenths percent (4.1%).























05/01/2026 8:05:20 AM JLL443